Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 10 Pardons

13-10-1.
Presentation of petitions.

Petitions for pardon under

R.I. Const., Art. IX, Sec. XIII

, shall be presented to the governor, and the petitioners shall comply with any rules and regulations respecting their filing and hearing that he or she may from time to time prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 21, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-10-1

.

13-10-2.
Compliance with terms and conditions.

In the exercise of the power of pardon, the person who receives the benefit of a pardon shall comply with, and be subject to, any terms and conditions that may be imposed by the governor at the time of the exercise of that power.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 21, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

13-10-2

.